Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska48-3403
Terms, defined.

For purposes of the Sector Partnership Program Act:

(1) Department means the Department of Labor;

(2) Local area means a workforce development area authorized by the federal Workforce Innovation and Opportunity Act and established in Nebraska;

(3) Local sector partnership or partnership means a workforce collaborative that organizes key stakeholders in a particular sector of business or industry in a local area into a working group that focuses on the shared goals and human resources needs of such sector;

(4) Local workforce development board means a local workforce development board authorized by the federal Workforce Innovation and Opportunity Act and established in Nebraska; and

(5) Nebraska Workforce Development Board means the state workforce development board authorized by the federal Workforce Innovation and Opportunity Act and established in Nebraska.

Laws 2016, LB1110, § 8.